test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_I_mitigwaab_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - I - mtigwaap :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mtigwaap+NA: mtigwaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+mtigwaap+NA: nmitgwaab
     2+mtigwaap+NA: gmitgwaab
     X+mtigwaap+NA: mitgwaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mtigwaap+NA+Con: mtigwaabiinh
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim: mtigwaabiins
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej: mtigwaabiish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mtigwaap+NA+Prt: mtigwaabiiba
     mtigwaap+NA+Voc+Pl: mtigwaabiidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mtigwaap+NA+4: mtigwaabiin
     mtigwaap+NA+Loc: mtigwaabiing
     mtigwaap+NA+Pl: mtigwaabiig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con: nmitgwaabiinh
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim: nmitgwaabiins
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con: gmitgwaabiinh
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim: gmitgwaabiins
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con: mitgwaabiinh
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim: mitgwaabiins
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos: nmitgwaabiim
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos: gmitgwaabiim
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos: mitgwaabiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej: nmitgwaabiish
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej: gmitgwaabiish
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Pej: mitgwaabiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiinaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiinaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiiwaa
     3+mtigwaap+NA+3+4: mitgwaabiini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Prt: nmitgwaabiiba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiidig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Prt: gmitgwaabiiba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiidig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Prt: mitgwaabiiba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+4: nmitgwaabiin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Loc: nmitgwaabiing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pl: nmitgwaabiig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+4: gmitgwaabiin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Loc: gmitgwaabiing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pl: gmitgwaabiig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+4: mitgwaabiin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Loc: mitgwaabiing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+4: mitgwaabiin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Loc: mitgwaabiing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Pl: mitgwaabiig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej: mtigwaabiinyish
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej: mtigwaabiinsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt: mtigwaabiinyba
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: mtigwaabiinydig
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt: mtigwaabiinsba
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: mtigwaabiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+4: mtigwaabiinyin
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Loc: mtigwaabiinying
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pl: mtigwaabiinyig
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+4: mtigwaabiinsan
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Loc: mtigwaabiinsing
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pl: mtigwaabiinsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Prt: mtigwaabiishba
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: mtigwaabiishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej+4: mtigwaabiishan
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Loc: mtigwaabiishing
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Pl: mtigwaabiishag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mtigwaap+NA+Prt+4: mtigwaabiibniin
     mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Loc: mtigwaabiibniing
     mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Pl: mtigwaabiibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos: nmitgwaabiinyim
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos: nmitgwaabiinsim
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos: gmitgwaabiinyim
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos: gmitgwaabiinsim
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos: mitgwaabiinyim
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos: mitgwaabiinsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej: nmitgwaabiinyish
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej: nmitgwaabiinsish
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej: gmitgwaabiinyish
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej: gmitgwaabiinsish
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej: mitgwaabiinyish
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej: mitgwaabiinsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiinynaa
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsnaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiinynaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiinywaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsnaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiinswaa
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+3+4: mitgwaabiinyni
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+3+4: mitgwaabiinsni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt: nmitgwaabiinyba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinydig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt: nmitgwaabiinsba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsdig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt: gmitgwaabiinyba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinydig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt: gmitgwaabiinsba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsdig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt: mitgwaabiinyba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiinydig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt: mitgwaabiinsba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+4: nmitgwaabiinyin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Loc: nmitgwaabiinying
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pl: nmitgwaabiinyig
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+4: nmitgwaabiinsan
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Loc: nmitgwaabiinsing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+4: gmitgwaabiinyin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Loc: gmitgwaabiinying
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+4: gmitgwaabiinsan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Loc: gmitgwaabiinsing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pl: gmitgwaabiinsag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+4: mitgwaabiinyin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Loc: mitgwaabiinying
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+4: mitgwaabiinsan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Loc: mitgwaabiinsing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+4: mitgwaabiinyin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Loc: mitgwaabiinying
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pl: mitgwaabiinyig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+4: mitgwaabiinsan
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Loc: mitgwaabiinsing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pl: mitgwaabiinsag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej: nmitgwaabiimish
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej: gmitgwaabiimish
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pej: mitgwaabiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiimnaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiimnaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiimwaa
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+3+4: mitgwaabiimni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt: nmitgwaabiimba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiimdig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt: gmitgwaabiimba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiimdig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Prt: mitgwaabiimba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiimdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+4: nmitgwaabiiman
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Loc: nmitgwaabiiming
     1+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pl: nmitgwaabiimag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+4: gmitgwaabiiman
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gmitgwaabiiming
     2+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pl: gmitgwaabiimag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+4: mitgwaabiiman
     3+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Loc: mitgwaabiiming
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+4: mitgwaabiiman
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Loc: mitgwaabiiming
     X+mtigwaap+NA+ThmPos+Pl: mitgwaabiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiishnaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiishnaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+2+Pl: gmitgwaabiishwaa
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+3+4: mitgwaabiishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Prt: nmitgwaabiishba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiishdig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Prt: gmitgwaabiishba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiishdig
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Prt: mitgwaabiishba
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: mitgwaabiishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+4: nmitgwaabiishan
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Loc: nmitgwaabiishing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Pl: nmitgwaabiishag
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+4: gmitgwaabiishan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Loc: gmitgwaabiishing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Pl: gmitgwaabiishag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+4: mitgwaabiishan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Loc: mitgwaabiishing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+4: mitgwaabiishan
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Loc: mitgwaabiishing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Pl: mitgwaabiishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+Prt: nmitgwaabiinaanba
     1+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmitgwaabiinaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiinaanba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiinaandig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+2+Pl+Prt: gmitgwaabiiwaaba
     2+mtigwaap+NA+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmitgwaabiiwaadig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+3+4+Prt: mitgwaabiinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+4: nmitgwaabiinaanin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+Loc: nmitgwaabiinaaning
     1+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+Pl: nmitgwaabiinaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiinaanin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiinaaning
     2+mtigwaap+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiinaanig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+2+Pl+4: gmitgwaabiiwaan
     2+mtigwaap+NA+2+Pl+Loc: gmitgwaabiiwaang
     2+mtigwaap+NA+2+Pl+Pl: gmitgwaabiiwaag
     3+mtigwaap+NA+2+Pl+4: mitgwaabiiwaan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+2+Pl+Loc: mitgwaabiiwaang
     3+mtigwaap+NA+3+4+4: mitgwaabiinwan
     3+mtigwaap+NA+3+4+Loc: mitgwaabiiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+4: nmitgwaabiibniin
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Loc: nmitgwaabiibniing
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Pl: nmitgwaabiibniig
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+4: gmitgwaabiibniin
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Loc: gmitgwaabiibniing
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Pl: gmitgwaabiibniig
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+4: mitgwaabiibniin
     3+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiibniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+4: mitgwaabiibniin
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Loc: mitgwaabiibniing
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Prt+Pl: mitgwaabiibniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: mtigwaabiinyshiba
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: mtigwaabiinyshidig
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: mtigwaabiinsshiba
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: mtigwaabiinsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+4: mtigwaabiinyshan
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: mtigwaabiinyshing
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: mtigwaabiinyshag
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+4: mtigwaabiinsshan
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: mtigwaabiinsshing
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: mtigwaabiinsshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+4: mtigwaabiinybaniin
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: mtigwaabiinybaniing
     mtigwaap+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: mtigwaabiinybaniig
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+4: mtigwaabiinsbaniin
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: mtigwaabiinsbaniing
     mtigwaap+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: mtigwaabiinsbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Prt+4: mtigwaabiishbaniin
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: mtigwaabiishbaniing
     mtigwaap+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: mtigwaabiishbaniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: nmitgwaabiinymish
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: nmitgwaabiinsmish
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gmitgwaabiinymish
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gmitgwaabiinsmish
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: mitgwaabiinymish
     X+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: mitgwaabiinsmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiinyminaa
     1+mtigwaap+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmitgwaabiinsminaa
     2+mtigwaap+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmitgwaabiinyminaa
